Maryland, session 2026, HB0344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
10–315.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONDITIONAL PRICE” MEANS A PRICE THAT IS AVAILABLE TO A
CUSTOMER ONLY IF A CONDITION IS MET, INCLUDING A SERVICE LEVEL,
ENROLLMENT IN A MEMBERSHIP PROGRAM, A REQUIRED PURCHASE, A PAYMENT
METHOD, OR ANY OTHER CONDITION MODIFYING THE STANDARD PRICE.
(3) “STANDARD PRICE” MEANS THE OFFERING PRICE AVAILABLE TO
ALL CUSTOMERS WITHOUT CONDITIONS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0344*

HOUSE BILL 344
(B) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of local law.
[(b)] (C) A person who sells motor fuel at retail shall display signs in accordance
with this section.
[(c)] (D) (1) All dispensing equipment for motor fuel shall be marked
conspicuously to show in numerals of equal size the price, including taxes, of a gallon of the
motor fuel offered for sale.
(2) If numerals that show a fractional cent are used, the combined height
and width of the numerator and denominator shall equal the height and width of the other
numerals used.
(E) (1) (I) EACH RETAIL SERVICE STATION DEALER SHALL KEEP A
SIGN ON THE PREMISES THAT:
1. PROMINENTLY DISPLAYS CLEARLY AND VISIBLY THE
STANDARD PRICE FOR A WHOLE MEASUREMENT UNIT OF REGULAR GASOLINE SOLD
ON THE PREMISES;
2. STATES THE UNIT OF MEASUREMENT USED; AND
3. IS READABLE BY PASSING MOTORISTS.
(II) A SIGN UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
MAY PROMINENTLY DISPLAY CLEARLY AND VISIBLY THE STANDARD PRICE FOR A
WHOLE MEASUREMENT UNIT OF DIESEL AND OTHER MOTOR FUEL PRODUCTS SOLD
ON THE PREMISES.
(III) IF A SIGN REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH DISPLAYS A CONDITIONAL PRICE, THE CONDITIONAL PRICE MAY NOT
BE DISPLAYED MORE PROMINENTLY THAN THE STANDARD PRICE.
(2) ALL NUMERALS ON A SIGN SHALL:
(I) BE UNIFORM;
(II) BE THE SAME SIZE;
(III) BE AT LEAST 8 INCHES HIGH AND 3.5 INCHES WIDE; AND
(IV) HAVE A BRUSH STROKE OF AT LEAST 1 INCH.

HOUSE BILL 344 3
(3) A NUMERAL IN A FRACTION OR A LETTER ON A PRICING SIGN OR
OTHER MEANS SHALL BE AT LEAST ONE–THIRD THE HEIGHT OF A NUMERAL THAT
INDICATES A WHOLE NUMBER.
(4) IF A NEW SIGN IS REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH THIS SUBSECTION,
THE SUPPLIER OF THE GASOLINE SHALL PROVIDE THE SIGN AND NUMERALS
WITHOUT COST TO THE RETAIL SERVICE STATION DEALER.
[(d)] (F) (1) A sign or other means on the premises and approaches to a retail
outlet that advertises the retail price of motor fuel:
(i) may list the price and each tax separately if the listing of the
total of the price and all taxes is the same size as the separate listing of the price; but
(ii) shall list the total of the price and all taxes by numerals of
uniform size.
(2) In the listing of the total of the price and all taxes, a denominator need
not be used to indicate a fraction, but:
(i) if a denominator is used, the numerator and denominator
combined shall be the same size as the numeral that indicates the whole number; or
(ii) if a denominator is not used, the numerator shall be the same
size as the numeral that indicates the whole number.
[(e)] (G) If the retail price of motor fuel is advertised on a sign or by other means
on the premises of and approaches to the retail outlet, the grade designation displayed for
any motor fuel in the advertisement shall be the same as the grade designation that is
required to be displayed for that motor fuel on the retail dispensing pump as specified by
the Comptroller.
[(f) (1) (i) Each retail service station dealer shall keep a sign on the
premises that:
1. prominently displays clearly and visibly, for a whole
measurement unit of regular gasoline sold on the premises:
A. the credit and debit price, if higher than the cash price; or
B. the credit and debit price and the cash price;
2. states the unit of measurement used; and
3. is readable by passing motorists.

HOUSE BILL 344
(ii) The sign required under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph also
may prominently display clearly and visibly, for a whole measurement unit of diesel and
other motor fuel products sold on the premises:
1. the credit and debit price, if higher than the cash price; or
2. the credit and debit price and the cash price.
(2) All numerals on the sign shall:
(i) be uniform;
(ii) be the same size;
(iii) be at least 8 inches high and 3.5 inches wide; and
(iv) have a brush stroke of at least 1 inch.
(3) A numeral in a fraction or a letter shall be at least one–third the height
of a numeral that indicates a whole number.
(4) If a new or additional sign is required to comply with this subsection,
the supplier of the gasoline shall provide the sign and numerals without cost to the retail
service station dealer.]
[(g)] (H) A sign required at a service station by this section or any other State or
federal law is exempt from the provisions of a local law, ordinance, or regulation for the
purpose of determining:
(1) the total number of signs permitted; and
(2) the area of signs permitted.
(I) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMPTROLLER MAY ASSESS AGAINST A PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION:
(I) FOR THE FIRST VIOLATION, A FINE OF UP TO $100; AND
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, A FINE OF UP
TO THE AMOUNT OF THE MAXIMUM FINE UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
MULTIPLIED BY THE TOTAL NUMBER OF VIOLATIONS.
(2) PRIOR TO ASSESSING A FINE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 344 5
(I) ISSUE A WRITTEN WARNING TO THE PERSON EXPLAINING
THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION;
(II) PROVIDE THE PERSON A REASONABLE OPPORTUNITY IN
THE COMPTROLLER’S DISCRETION TO CURE THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) CONSIDER:
1. THE SERIOUSNESS OF THE VIOLATION;
2. THE HARM CAUSED BY THE VIOLATION;
3. THE GOOD FAITH OF THE PERSON; AND
4. ANY HISTORY OF PREVIOUS VIOLATIONS BY THE
PERSON.
(3) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL PAY ANY FINE COLLECTED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(4) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY REPORT A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION TO
THE COMPTROLLER USING A PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE COMPTROLLER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.